Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1596.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 41, chapter 37, article 2, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-3958, to read: START_STATUTE41-3958. Homeless shelter and services fund; exemption A. The homeless shelter and services fund is established. The department shall administer the fund. The fund consists of legislative appropriations, other monies directed to be deposited in the fund and investment earnings on monies in the fund.  On notice from the department, the state treasurer shall invest and divest monies in the fund as provided by section 35-313, and monies earned from investment shall be credited to the fund. B. Monies in the fund are continuously appropriated. The department shall use the monies to award grants pursuant to chapter 24 of this title to counties, cities, towns, Indian tribes and nonprofit organizations for programs that provide shelter and services to unsheltered persons who are experiencing homelessness. C. Monies in the fund are exempt from the provisions of section 35-190 relating to lapsing of appropriations. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Appropriation; homeless shelter and services fund The sum of $50,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the homeless shelter and services fund established by section 41-3958, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act.